Washington statutes.
RCW 36.90.070

Conveyance of property to Lewis county for fair purposes.

Upon payment to the state of Washington by Lewis county of the sum of one dollar, which sum shall be deposited in the general fund when received by the treasurer of the state of Washington, such treasurer is authorized and directed to certify to the governor and secretary of state that such payment has been made on the following described property presently utilized for southwest Washington fair purposes situated in Lewis county, Washington: "Beginning at the intersection of the south line of section Seventeen (17) Township Fourteen (14) North of Range Two (2) West of W.M. with the West right-of-way line of the Somerville consent Road, and running thence North 15 degrees 20 feet East along the West line of said Road, Eleven Hundred Forty-four (1144) feet, thence North 2 degrees 33 feet West along the said west line Seventy-four and four-tenths (74.4) feet, thence west on a line parallel with the said south line of said Section Seventeen (17) Eleven Hundred Sixty-seven and two tenths (1167.2) feet to within one hundred fifty (150) feet to the Center line of the Northern Pacific Railroad, thence south 16 degrees 20 feet West on a line parallel with and one hundred fifty (150) feet distant Easterly from the Center line of the Northern Pacific Railroad Eleven Hundred and Thirty-five and seven-tenths (1135.7) feet, thence East on a line parallel with and Eighty-seven and three-tenths (87.3) feet north of the south line of said section seventeen (17) eight hundred fifty-seven (857) feet, thence south 74 degrees 40 feet East three hundred thirty (330) feet to the point of beginning, containing thirty (30) acres in Section Seventeen (17) Township Fourteen (14) North of Range Two (2) West of W.M." and the governor is thereby authorized and directed forthwith to execute and the secretary of state is authorized and directed to attest to a deed conveying said lands to Lewis county, Washington. The office of the attorney general and the commissioner of public lands shall offer any necessary assistance in carrying out such conveyance. This conveyance shall be understood to have no use restrictions and to give Lewis county control of the property for fair and county purposes as set forth in this chapter.

[ 2024 c 75 s 5; 1973 1st ex.s. c 97 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 97: See note following RCW 36.90.010.